Florida, session 2026, HB1505.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 775.027, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
775.027 Insanity Defense of lack of culpable mental
state.—
(1) AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE.—All persons are presumed to be
sane. It is a defense to a prosecution under any law that a
defendant, as a result of mental disease or defect, lacked the
culpable mental state required as an element of the crime
charged. Mental disease or defect is not otherwise a defense to
a prosecution under any law an affirmative defense to a criminal
prosecution that, at the time of the commission of the acts
constituting the offense, the defendant was insane. Insanity is
established when:
(a) The defendant had a mental infirmity, disease, or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1505-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1505 2026
defect; and
(b) Because of this condition, the defendant:
1. Did not know what he or she was doing or its
consequences; or
2. Although the defendant knew what he or she was doing
and its consequences, the defendant did not know that what he or
she was doing was wrong.

Mental infirmity, disease, or defect does not constitute a
defense of insanity except as provided in this subsection.
(2) BURDEN OF PROOF.—The defendant has the burden of
proving the defense of insanity by clear and convincing
evidence.
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 916.12, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
916.12 Mental competence to proceed.—
(3) In considering the issue of competence to proceed, an
examining expert shall first consider and specifically include
in his or her report the defendant's capacity to:
(a) Appreciate the charges or allegations against the
defendant.
(b) Appreciate the range and nature of possible penalties,
if applicable, that may be imposed in the proceedings against
the defendant.
(c) Understand the adversarial nature of the legal
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1505-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1505 2026
process.
(d) Disclose to counsel facts pertinent to the proceedings
at issue.
(e) Manifest appropriate courtroom behavior.
(f) Testify relevantly.

In addition, an examining expert shall administer a clinically
recognized instrument to determine whether the defendant is
malingering consider and include the results of this instrument
in his or her report, along with any other factor deemed
relevant by the expert.
Section 3. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
921.0026, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
921.0026 Mitigating circumstances.—This section applies to
any felony offense, except any capital felony, committed on or
after October 1, 1998.
(2) Mitigating circumstances under which a departure from
the lowest permissible sentence is reasonably justified include,
but are not limited to:
(d) The defendant requires specialized treatment for a
mental disorder that is unrelated to substance abuse or
addiction or for a physical disability, and the defendant is
amenable to treatment.
Section 4. Section 921.245, Florida Statutes, is created
100 to read:
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1505-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1505 2026
101 921.245 Mental health treatment for convicted defendants.—
102 (1) If a convicted defendant requires specialized
103 treatment for a mental disease or defect that is unrelated to
104 substance abuse or addiction, and the defendant is amenable to
105 treatment, such treatment may be incorporated into his or her
106 criminal sentence, but the treatment may not provide a basis for
107 a sentencing court to depart from the lowest permissible
108 sentence established by the Criminal Punishment Code.
109 (2) This section does not prevent a sentencing court from
110 considering a defendant's mental disease or defect when imposing
111 a sentence within the permissible sentencing range established
112 by the Criminal Punishment Code.
113 Section 5. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1505-00